Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 5. Assault and Battery
§ 6-2-502.
Aggravated assault and battery; female genital mutilation; penalty.

A person is guilty of aggravated assault and battery if he engages in any of the following:

Causes or attempts to cause serious bodily injury to another intentionally, knowingly or recklessly under circumstances manifesting extreme indifference to the value of human life;

Attempts to cause, or intentionally or knowingly causes bodily injury to another with a deadly weapon;

Threatens to use a drawn deadly weapon on another unless reasonably necessary in defense of his person, property or abode or to prevent serious bodily injury to another;

Intentionally, knowingly or recklessly causes bodily injury to a woman whom he knows is pregnant;

Intentionally, knowingly or recklessly causes female genital mutilation to be performed on a person who has not attained the age of eighteen (18) years.

Aggravated assault and battery is a felony punishable by imprisonment:

For not more than ten (10) years for violations of paragraphs (a)(i) through (iv) of this section;

For not less than five (5) years and not more than twenty-five (25) years for violations of paragraph (a)(v) of this section.

It is not a defense in a prosecution under paragraph (a)(v) of this section that a female under eighteen (18) years of age or the parent, guardian or custodian of the female under eighteen (18) years of age consented to the female genital mutilation. Religion, ritual, custom or standard practice shall not be a defense to the offense of female genital mutilation.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 1984, ch. 44, § 2; 2009, ch. 195, § 1; 2020 ch. 105, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

Cross references. —

For definition of “recklessly,” see §

6-1-104

.

As to sexual battery, see §

6-2-313

.

As to weapons offenses, see chapter 8 of this title.

The 2009 amendment,

inserted “or attempts to cause” in (a)(i).

Laws 2009, ch. 195, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2009.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in the introductory language of (a) added “engages in any of the following” at the end; added (a)(v) and made a related change; designated (b) as the introductory language of (b) and (b)(i); in (b)(i) added “for violations of paragraphs (a)(i) through (iv) of this section” at the end and made related changes; added (b)(ii) and (c).

Construction. —

Legislature's use of the word “or” in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-502(a)(i) indicates that any one of the three states of mind is sufficient to support a conviction.
Burnett v. State, 2011 WY 169, 267 P.3d 1083,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 2011).

Knowingly element did not require the State to prove that defendant purposefully hit the victim’s vehicle, and the evidence was sufficient to support his conviction because it showed that despite defendant’s knowledge of the effects of inhalants, he chose to huff and drive himself to work, he admitted that he possibly inhaled more along the way, a witness saw the air duster can in his lap as he was driving, and defendant lost consciousness, hit another vehicle, and injured the other driver. Hopkins v. State, 2019 WY 77, 445 P.3d 582,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 7

9 (Wyo. 2019); Wyo. Jet Ctr., LLC v. Jackson Hole Airport Bd., 2019 WY 6, 432 P.3d 910,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 2019).

Testimony of officers prejudicial. —

Even though the trial court abused its discretion when it permitted evidence of the law enforcement officers' reactions to defendant's fired shot, because their perception of threat was not an element of aggravated assault and because it was unduly prejudicial, as it was possible that the jury would sympathize with the officers, the error was not prejudicial because the other evidence against defendant was overwhelming. Hill v. State, 2016 WY 27, 371 P.3d 553,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 2016).

Instruction on reckless under circumstances manifesting extreme indifference to the value of human life. —

In an aggravated assault and battery trial pursuant to § 6-2-502(a)(i) the jury should be given an instruction defining “reckless under circumstances manifesting extreme indifference to the value of human life” rather than just “reckless”; that is, the instruction must include language explaining that if the jury determines the defendant acted recklessly, the jury must then determine whether that recklessness rose to the level of “extreme indifference to the value of human life.” O'Brien v. State, 2002 WY 63, 45 P.3d 225,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 2002).

Testimony of victim not error. —

Testimony of stabbing victim as to pain and problems he had suffered was properly allowed, because one element of crime of aggravated assault was infliction of bodily injury with a deadly weapon. Hernandez v. State, 976 P.2d 672,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1999).

Victim's testimony admissible to show deadly weapon. —

Testimony of the victim and his wife, taken in their totality, was not victim-impact testimony, but was relevant and admissible because the context in which the testimony was given showed that it related to the victim's injury which was caused by a deadly weapon, and in order to convict the defendant for aggravated assault and battery, the state had to prove he used a deadly weapon. Baier v. State, 891 P.2d 754,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1995).

Weapons considered deadly. —

A weapon capable of producing and likely to produce death or great bodily injury is a deadly weapon. Evanson v. State, 546 P.2d 412,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1976); Brightwell v. State, 631 P.2d 1048,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 362

(Wyo. 1981).

Unloaded firearm. —

Definition of “deadly weapon” includes an unloaded firearm, and therefore assault with an unloaded gun was properly elevated to offense of aggravated assault. Dike v. State, 990 P.2d 1012,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 176

(Wyo. 1999), cert. denied, 529 U.S. 1078, 120 S. Ct. 1697, 146 L. Ed. 2d 502, 2000 U.S. LEXIS 2756 (U.S. 2000).

Mere presence of weapon, without threat, insufficient. —

Subsection (a)(iii) requires proof of an actual threat of physical injury during the act of employing a deadly weapon. It was error for the trial judge to insinuate that factual circumstances would govern in determining if the (mere) presence of a weapon in hand could constitute a threat to use. It cannot. Johnston v. State, 747 P.2d 1132,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 571

(Wyo. 1987).

Proof of the mere presence of a weapon is insufficient to satisfy the “threatens to use” element of aggravated assault and battery; instead, that element requires proof of an actual threat of physical injury while employing the deadly weapon. Gunderson v. State, 925 P.2d 1300,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1996), reh'g denied,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. Oct. 29, 1996).

Pointing loaded pistol at another constitutes aggravated assault and battery,

even though it fails to fire when the trigger is pulled. Evanson v. State, 546 P.2d 412,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1976).

As does holding knife in threatening manner. —

When a knife is held in a threatening manner only inches from a person's body, an aggravated assault and battery with a deadly weapon has occurred. Brightwell v. State, 631 P.2d 1048,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 362

(Wyo. 1981).

Meaning of “threaten.” —

Trial court did not err in refusing defendant's proposed jury instruction, since definition of phrase “threatens to use” found in subdivision (a)(iii) of this section was not different from its ordinary meaning, and there was no meaningful distinction between “threaten” and “actually threaten.” Streitmatter v. State, 981 P.2d 921,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 1999).

Unconditional threat not required. —

The court did not err by denying the defendant's motion to dismiss counts of aggravated assault and battery because his threats were allegedly conditioned upon his wife's attempt to leave their home with the children; this section does not require an unconditional threat. Thom v. State, 792 P.2d 192,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 1990).

Infliction of actual injury not required. —

In order to commit an aggravated assault and battery with a deadly weapon, actual injury need not be inflicted. Brightwell v. State, 631 P.2d 1048,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 362

(Wyo. 1981).

Assaulting a household member. —

There was sufficient evidence to find defendant guilty on both alternatives of: (1) unlawfully touching a household member in a rude, insolent or angry manner and (2) intentionally, knowingly or recklessly causing bodily injury to a household member where the victim was awakened from sleeping on the couch at the residence where she and defendant were temporarily living by defendant punching her in the face. Messer v. State, 2004 WY 98, 96 P.3d 12,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 2004).

No variance in alleging serious bodily injury. —

In a prosecution for aggravated assault and battery after defendant bit off a piece of the victim's ear, and the charging documents had consistently stated that defendant was alleged to have caused serious bodily injury to the victim and did not indicate the prosecution was limiting its theory of the case to a showing of severe disfigurement, where a physician testified to the victim's hearing loss, it was not a case where the evidence presented at trial was different from the crime charged, and where defendant had failed to file a motion for a bill of particulars, the trial court properly denied her motion for a continuance so that she could consult with an audiologist. Young v. State, 2005 WY 136, 121 P.3d 145,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 2005).

Seriousness of bodily harm question for jury. —

What constitutes serious bodily harm under subsection (a) is ordinarily a question for the jury. State v. Woodward, 69 Wyo. 262, 240 P.2d 1157,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1952).

But it would have been sheer speculation

to conclude that defendant could have presented a competent witness at trial to testify that child would have suffered less than serious bodily injury had he been wearing a protective helmet, therefore, defendant cannot claim she was prejudiced by the court's ruling or establish that it amounted to an abuse of discretion. Hermreck v. State, 956 P.2d 335,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1998).

As is question whether weapon dangerous or deadly. —

Whether an automatic pistol in which fully loaded cartridge clip may not have been inserted into a locked position is a dangerous or deadly weapon for prosecution for aggravated assault and battery while armed with a dangerous or deadly weapon is a jury question. Shafsky v. State, 526 P.2d 60,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 229

(Wyo. 1974).

It is for the jury to decide whether or not a weapon is dangerous or deadly upon the evidence as it appears in the record. Evanson v. State, 546 P.2d 412,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1976).

Jury instructions, when read together, were adequate and appropriate for the purpose of informing the jury that the deadly weapon the state alleged to have been used by the defendant was his shoes and, even though shoes might not generally be considered a deadly weapon, the jury could find they could be so characterized under the circumstances of the case. See Warren v. State, 835 P.2d 304,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 1992).

Evidence sufficient on threat. —

Evidence was sufficient to sustain defendant’s aggravated assault and battery conviction where several officers testified that he fired shots at three officers, and the shots ricocheted past the locations of other officers. Pickering v. State, 2020 WY 66, 464 P.3d 236,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 2020).

Displaying a knife while advancing on a police officer while insisting he was not going back to jail was sufficient for a jury to rationally conclude defendant threatened to use the knife on the officer, and the lack of a direct verbal threat was not determinative, so evidence was sufficient to convict defendant of aggravated assault and battery. Cotney v. State, 2022 WY 17, 503 P.3d 58,

2022 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 2022).

Not error to fail to instruct jury that firearm operability essential element of offense. —

Absent the introduction of some evidence that the firearm in question was inoperable, it is not error to fail to instruct the jury that operability is an essential element of the offense of being a felon in possession of a firearm. Benson v. State, 640 P.2d 83,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 296

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 456 U.S. 1006, 102 S. Ct. 2297, 73 L. Ed. 2d 1301, 1982 U.S. LEXIS 2339 (U.S. 1982).

Sadomasochistic materials admissible. —

In a prosecution for aggravated assault with a deadly weapon, involving the defendant cutting the penis of his three-year-old son, the court did not err in admitting evidence of sadomasochistic materials to show “motive and/or identification.” Marker v. State, 748 P.2d 295,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1988).

Consecutive sentences for aggravated assault and attempted second degree murder.—

Defendant was properly sentenced consecutively for the crimes for which defendant was convicted because there was no double jeopardy violation in that aggravated assault and battery was not the same offense as attempted second-degree murder pursuant to the same-elements test. Jones v. State, 2016 WY 110, 384 P.3d 260,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 2016).

Constitutionality.—

Defendant was properly sentenced consecutively for the crimes for which defendant was convicted because defendant failed to demonstrate that the statutes for aggravated assault and battery and for attempted second-degree murder were unconstitutionally vague, either on their face or as applied to the facts of defendant's case. Jones v. State, 2016 WY 110, 384 P.3d 260,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 2016).

Aggravated assault with a dangerous or deadly weapon is a general intent crime.

Simmons v. State, 674 P.2d 1294,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 248

(Wyo. 1984);
Cox v. State, 829 P.2d 1183,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 1992).

Subdivision (a)(iii) of this section is not unconstitutionally vague; aggravated assault is a general intent crime, which requires only that intent which can be inferred from commission of the proscribed act. Streitmatter v. State, 981 P.2d 921,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 1999).

Requisite intent. —

As a general intent crime, aggravated assault requires only that intent which may be inferred from doing the act which constitutes the offense charged. Cox v. State, 829 P.2d 1183,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 1992).

Intent may be inferred from conduct of defendant and from circumstantial evidence.

Fuller v. State, 568 P.2d 900,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 310

(Wyo. 1977);
Brightwell v. State, 631 P.2d 1048,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 362

(Wyo. 1981);
Carfield v. State, 649 P.2d 865,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 373

(Wyo. 1982).

The specifics of a defendant's conduct and other circumstantial evidence may permit the jury to infer that he acted with the specific intent to cause bodily injury. Garcia v. State, 777 P.2d 1091,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 1989).

Intent to injure a driver may be inferred from firing a shotgun

at a moving vehicle. Simmons v. State, 674 P.2d 1294,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 248

(Wyo. 1984).

Evidence sufficient on threat. —

There was
sufficient evidence to sustain a conviction under this section for
aggravated assault and battery because, even though defendant did
not point a knife directly at a victim, a factfinder could have reasonably
concluded that he made an actual threat to use the knife on the victim
where he was slashing, puncturing, and prying at a bedroom door. Levengood v. State, 2014 WY 138, 336 P.3d 1201,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 2014).

Evidence was sufficient to prove that defendant threatened to use the weapon he was carrying on law enforcement officers where the officers had been in pursuit of defendant, he defied their orders, and he was carrying a deadly weapon and firing it as he ran away from the officers. Hill v. State, 2016 WY 27, 371 P.3d 553,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 2016).

Knowingly driving automobile at another infers intent. —

One who knowingly drives an automobile directly at another person can reasonably be found to have intended to do bodily injury to that person. Walter v. State, 811 P.2d 716,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 1991).

Evidence sufficient on issue of intent. —

The evidence, viewed in a light most favorable to the state, showed: defendant was a 43-year old, 6'3” man, weighing 245 pounds, towering over his victim, a 19 year-old, 5'11” boy, weighing 155 pounds; “working,” i.e., opening and closing, a butterfly knife as he approached within inches of the victim's throat; nicking the victim; only to be interrupted in the further employment of the knife by the advent of the victim's mother onto the scene. Under these circumstances, not only could the jury properly have inferred a threatening employment of the drawn knife as an expression of an intention to inflict pain and injury, meeting the requirements of subsection (a)(iii), but also as an accomplishment of that expression as manifested by the nicked and bloodied throat.
Johnston v. State, 747 P.2d 1132,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 571

(Wyo. 1987).

Defendant was convicted of aggravated assault in violation of this section based on evidence that he got a gun from his car, pointed it at the victims, and fired twice.
Ken v. State, 2011 WY 167, 267 P.3d 567,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 2011).

Evidence sufficient on issue of intent so as to impose a four-level enhancement. —

District court properly understood the intent element of aggravated assault and properly applied the correct definition of “aggravated assault” under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-502(a)(iii) when it imposed a four-level enhancement under U.S. Sentencing Guidelines Manual § 2K2.1(b)(5) in sentencing defendant to 120 months incarceration after he pled guilty to a charge of being a felon in possession of a firearm in violation of 18 U.S.C.S. §§ 922(g)(1) and 924(a)(2); a preponderance of the evidence supported the district court's conclusion that defendant's shooting of his girlfriend was intentional and the product of domestic violence rather than accidental as claimed by defendant. United States v. Mozee, 405 F.3d 1082,

2005 U.S. App. LEXIS 7188

(10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 546 U.S. 905, 126 S. Ct. 253, 163 L. Ed. 2d 230, 2005 U.S. LEXIS 6629 (U.S. 2005).

No requirement of specific intent for conviction under subsection (a)(iv). —

There is no requirement that an assailant purposely kill an unborn child for a conviction under subsection (a)(iv), nor is any other requirement of specific intent disclosed; all that is required is the causing of bodily injury to a woman whom the assailant knows to be pregnant. Goodman v. State, 573 P.2d 400,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 322

(Wyo. 1977).

Aggravated assault with deadly weapon not always includable offense in involuntary manslaughter. —

The elements of aggravated assault with a deadly weapon are not always necessarily includable in the crime of involuntary manslaughter perpetrated during the commission of an unlawful act. Stamper v. State, 662 P.2d 82,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 301

(Wyo. 1983).

Self-defense is justification or excuse for otherwise unlawful aggravated assault and battery.

Mewes v. State, 517 P.2d 487,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 194

(Wyo. 1973).

Instruction on right to arm oneself. —

It was within the court's discretion whether or not to specifically instruct the jury of the accused's right to arm himself, where no special circumstances as such required the court to give such an instruction, and the court properly instructed the jury on self-defense without any limitation as to provoking the difficulty. Baier v. State, 891 P.2d 754,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1995).

Defense of others as justification

for infliction of harm on another is applicable not only to an actual assailant, but also to those acting in concert with the assailant, to the extent the defensive force used is necessary and reasonable. Duckett v. State, 966 P.2d 941,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 1998).

Burden is on defendant charged with aggravated assault to establish a prima facie case on every element of his alleged legal justification; once defendant does so, court must instruct jury on state's burden to negate this defense beyond a reasonable doubt. Duckett v. State, 966 P.2d 941,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 1998).

Reversal of conviction for speedy trial violation. —

Defendant's conviction for two counts of aggravated assault with a deadly weapon was reversed on appeal due to a speedy trial violation. The 720-day delay in bringing him was due largely to the district court's erroneous refusal to accept defendant's nolo contendere plea because he was unwilling to concede that he committed the crime without provocation; this is contrary to Wyoming law. Berry v. State, 2004 WY 81, 93 P.3d 222,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 2004).

Evidence sufficient to show aggravated assault and battery. —

See State v. Schloredt, 57 Wyo. 1, 111 P.2d 128,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1941); State v. Woodward, 69 Wyo. 262, 240 P.2d 1157,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1952); Shafsky v. State, 526 P.2d 60,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 229

(Wyo. 1974); Hampton v. State, 558 P.2d 504,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 221

(Wyo. 1977); Trujillo v. State, 750 P.2d 1334,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 1988).

The following evidence was sufficient to sustain a conviction of two counts of aggravated assault and battery: (1) the victim was stabbed in the back; (2) a witness saw the defendant hit the victim in the back with a stab-like punch; (3) the victim felt pain and, when he turned around, saw a blade in the defendant's hand; (4) the defendant then slashed the victim with a knife; (5) no other nearby party had a knife; and (6) after the defendant was felled with a pool stick, he procured a machete, ran back into the bar where the altercation started and threatened to lop off heads. Abeyta v. State, 705 P.2d 330,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 539

(Wyo. 1985).

The jury reasonably inferred that a criminal defendant's actions with a gun constituted an actual threat to physically injure the victim where the victim testified that the defendant pointed the gun at her and stated that he was going to blow her head off. Gunderson v. State, 925 P.2d 1300,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1996), reh'g denied,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. Oct. 29, 1996).

Evidence was sufficient to establish that the defendant caused bodily injury to the victim by kicking him with steel-toed boots where (1) the state presented several photographs that graphically depicted the victim's injuries; (2) a physician testified that those injuries “corresponded” with a report he received that the victim had been struck and kicked multiple times about the face and head; (3) witnesses testified that the defendant kicked the victim in the head and chest; (4) the defendant initially told police that he had kicked the victim once in the head and once in the chest; and (5) blood and skin were found on the toes of the defendant's boots, and some of the blood matched the victim's blood type. Lucero v. State, 14 P.3d 920,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 233

(Wyo. 2000).

Where the defendant went to the front door of the complainant's home and told her to let him in the home and where, to reinforce that demand, he held up a handgun, a jury could rationally conclude that defendant made an actual threat to use a drawn deadly weapon on the complainant, and there was sufficient evidence to support defendant's conviction under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-502(a)(iii). Hart v. State, 2003 WY 12, 62 P.3d 566,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 2003).

Evidence was sufficient to convict defendant of assault and battery where the jury could have determined that it was not reasonably necessary for defendant to defend herself by arming herself, pointing the weapon at the victim and cocking the hammer; although there was conflicting evidence as to whether defendant threatened to shoot the victim, defendant's actions met the definition of “threatens to use” under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-502

. Miller v. State, 2003 WY 55, 67 P.3d 1191,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 2003).

Jury Instruction Proper.—

Sufficient evidence supported defendant's conviction for aggravated assault and battery in violation of
Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-502(a)(ii) when (1) defendant admitted that he pulled out a knife and that someone in a white shirt might have come in contact with the knife; (2) defendant's knife was the only knife found at the scene; (3) the victim wore a white shirt and was in fact stabbed; and (4) the wound was consistent with a stabbing rather than an accidental cutting.
Mendoza v. State, 2007 WY 26, 151 P.3d 1112,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 2007).

Defendant minor, who took a loaded firearm to a park, was behind a cluster of trees, and when a group of teenagers appeared, defendant emerged from the trees and began firing in their direction, striking two of them. Taking these facts in the light most favorable to the State, there was sufficient evidence that a reasonable jury could infer that defendant acted with the intent to cause bodily injury to the members of the group of teenagers. Sam v. State, 2017 WY 98, 401 P.3d 834,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 2017), cert. denied, 138 S. Ct. 1988, 201 L. Ed. 2d 248, 2018 U.S. LEXIS 3049 (U.S. 2018).

Evidence was sufficient to convict defendant of aggravated assault and battery as it showed that defendant threatened to use a drawn deadly weapon against the victims because the jury heard approximately 32 minutes of defendant calling the victims names while taunting and threatening to shoot or kill them when the State played the victim’s cell phone recording at trial; and the victims saw defendant outside, discharging his firearm. Birch v. State, 2018 WY 73, 421 P.3d 528,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 2018).

Evidence was sufficient to convict defendant of conspiracy to commit aggravated burglary, aggravated robbery, and aggravated assault and battery as the State presented evidence that defendant and the accomplice agreed to use the gun during the incident at the golf course because the golf course’s manager testified that after he hit defendant in the head with the flashlight, defendant turned and ran away; the manager then heard someone saying to shoot him; seconds later, the manager heard a gunshot and saw a muzzle flash; and it was reasonable for the jury to infer that the accomplice would have only said to shoot the manager if he knew defendant had a gun in his possession. Jordin v. State, 2018 WY 64, 419 P.3d 527,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 2018).

Court upheld defendant's conviction for assault and battery where (1) an officer's testimony concerning defendant's refusal to talk to him did not reflect an intent to cast guilt upon defendant in violation of her constitutional right to remain silent; (2) the district court did not err in admitting evidence of uncharged misconduct under Wyo. R. Evid. 404(b) because the challenged evidence served as impeachment under Wyo. R. Evid. 607; (3) an officer's rebuttal testimony was permissible under Wyo. R. Evid. 613(b) to introduce a prior inconsistent statement; (4) in rebuttal, the State was entitled to counter defendant's characterizations by offering opinion evidence, under Wyo. R. Evid. 405(a), of character contradicting the traits that defendant had described in the victim and denied in herself; and (5) and the evidence was sufficient to support the conviction.
Cazier v. State, 2006 WY 153, 148 P.3d 23,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 2006).

Evidence insufficient. —

Where assault charges arose from a taped interview with the victim who died before trial, because the victim's statement regarding her spinal injury and MRI results was not admissible under Wyo. R. Evid. 804(b)(6), proof of serious bodily injury was wanting as to count that defendant beat the victim with a stick across her back, causing multiple lacerations and bruising, and there was insufficient evidence that victim suffered a serious bodily injury despite victim's allegations that defendant beat the victim with a pistol belt full of 41-caliber shells causing multiple lacerations and bruising. Sarr v. State, 2003 WY 42, 65 P.3d 711,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 2003), aff'd, 2004 WY 20, 85 P.3d 439,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 2004).

Evidence sufficient to show aggravated assault and pregnancy. —

In a prosecution for aggravated assault on a pregnant woman, evidence was sufficient to permit the jury to draw the conclusion that the victim in the case was pregnant at the time of the assault based on her testimony, despite the fact that no medical evidence of her pregnancy was provided, and to conclude that the defendant assaulted the victim, based on the testimony of witnesses, even though the victim did not specifically testify that the defendant injured her. Glenn v. State, 2003 WY 4, 61 P.3d 389,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 2003).

Testimony of officer not prejudicial. —

There was no material prejudice and reversal was not warranted, where failure of officer to include the word “allegedly” in one sentence did not alert the jury to the point that it relied on this statement in reaching its verdict. Dudley v. State, 951 P.2d 1176,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1998).

Admission of irrelevant evidence was harmless. —

Even though a physician's testimony concerning his treatment of a witness after the fight should not have been admitted because it was not relevant under Wyo. R. Evid. 401, as defendant was not charged with assaulting the witness, and the evidence was not admissible to rehabilitate the witness's credibility, the error was harmless because the witness made it clear that defendant did not attack him or cause his injuries, and therefore testimony about the extent of his injuries could not reflect badly on defendant or unfairly turn the jury against him.
Evenson v. State, 2008 WY 24, 177 P.3d 819,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2008).

Instruction on extreme indifference to the value of human life. —

Where in answering jury's question concerning the meaning of the phrase “extreme indifference to the value of human life” the judge responded that the State was not required to prove the defendant had an intent to kill in order to convict the defendant of aggravated assault and battery, and that the “value of human life” phrase was broad enough to include quality of life in addition to whether someone lives or dies, the given instruction, by confirming that intent to kill need not be proved and that the jury could consider the effect on “quality of life,” sufficiently indicated that the jury could consider the nature of the act itself and the severity of any resulting injury, and defendant's conviction for aggravated assault and battery was therefore affirmed. Williams v. State, 2002 WY 136, 54 P.3d 248,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 2002).

Instruction on “deadly weapon.” —

In a prosecution for aggravated assault and battery, it was not error for the court to instruct the jury as to the definition of “deadly weapon,” without instructing the jury as to the definition of “serious bodily injury,” which term is part of the definition of “deadly weapon.” Wilson v. State, 14 P.3d 912,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 234

(Wyo. 2000).

Elements of former assault with deadly weapon. —

See Brown v. State, 590 P.2d 1312,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 364

(Wyo. 1979); Brightwell v. State, 631 P.2d 1048,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 362

(Wyo. 1981); Edge v. State, 647 P.2d 557,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 350

(Wyo. 1982), See also, Evanson v. State, 546 P.2d 412,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1976); Fuller v. State, 568 P.2d 900,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 310

(Wyo. 1977).

Substantial evidence supporting conviction of mayhem (former §

6-4-601

). —

See Polston v. State, 685 P.2d 1,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 297

(Wyo. 1984).

Effectiveness of counsel upheld. —

The failure to object to the Wyoming Evidence Rule 404(b) evidence may well have been a trial tactic where the record supported possible reasons why appellant's defense may have been enhanced by the admission of the prior bad acts, including the opportunity to impeach the victim since appellant denied the “prior bad acts” occurred. Dudley v. State, 951 P.2d 1176,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1998).

Prosecution for both homicide of fetus and assault on pregnant woman not double jeopardy. —

A defendant may be prosecuted both for the act of killing an unborn child during an assault and battery on a pregnant woman and for the aggravated assault and battery on the pregnant woman (or her killing) without violating the rule against double jeopardy. Goodman v. State, 601 P.2d 178,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 473

(Wyo. 1979).

Prosecution not barred by double jeopardy. —

Prosecution of defendant for aggravated assault and battery was not barred by the double jeopardy provision of the Wyoming and U.S. Constitutions even though defendant had already been convicted of misdemeanor battery in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-501(b) based on the same attack because although evidence of the greater offense existed at the time of the original conviction, the state was unable to discover such evidence despite the exercise of due diligence.
Daniel v. State, 2008 WY 87, 189 P.3d 859,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 90

(Wyo. 2008).

Defendant's convictions for aggravated assault and battery with a deadly weapon and attempted second degree murder—which were both premised upon defendant driving a vehicle through a yard and almost striking the victim—did not violate the prohibition against double jeopardy in that malice, an element of attempted second degree murder, did not necessarily include proof of the use of a deadly weapon, an element of aggravated assault and battery with a deadly weapon. Webb v. State, 2017 WY 108, 401 P.3d 914,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 2017).

Prosecutorial misconduct.—

In a case in which defendant was convicted of aggravated assault and battery, the prosecutor's statement in closing argument that the presumption of innocence “no longer exists” and his attempt to define “reasonable doubt” constituted prosecutorial misconduct. However, because defendant was not prejudiced by the prosecutor's improper statements, his cumulative error claim failed. Watts v. State, 2016 WY 40, 370 P.3d 104,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 2016).

Prosecution for aggravated assault, DUI injury, constitutional. —

The prosecution and conviction of the defendant for aggravated assault and battery after he pled guilty to causing serious bodily injury to another as a result of driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor did not violate the constitutional prohibition against double jeopardy, since each offense required proof of an element not necessary for proof of the other. Nowack v. State, 774 P.2d 561,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1989).

Consistency of verdict. —

Because the
jury found that defendant both attempted to cause and intentionally
caused bodily injury to the victim with a deadly weapon, its special
findings were consistent with the verdict against defendant for aggravated
assault and battery. Secrest v. State, 2013 WY 102, 310 P.3d 882,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(Wyo. 2013).

Sentencing.—

In sentencing for being felon in possession of a firearm, a Wyoming conviction for threatening to use a drawn deadly weapon qualified as a crime of violence under U.S. Sentencing Guidelines Manual § 4B1.1 because the Wyoming statute requires that a weapon be “drawn,” meaning in a position for use when the threat was made. United States v. Devries, 708 Fed. Appx. 956, 2017 U.S. App. LEXIS 18335 (10th Cir. 2017).

Trial judge fully understood lawful sentencing alternatives, including probation. —

See Cook v. State, 710 P.2d 824,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 616

(Wyo. 1985).

Refusal to allow withdrawal of nolo contendere plea not an issue of discretion. —

Defendant was not allowed to withdraw his nolo contendere plea to aggravated assault because (1) he originally pled not guilty; (2) a plea withdrawal would prejudice the government, as the crime occurred almost a year and a half earlier; (3) defendant delayed moving to withdraw the plea for nearly two months after entering it; (4) the delay caused by withdrawing the plea would substantially inconvenience the court; (5) nothing showed defense counsel provided ineffective assistance; (6) the plea was knowing and voluntary; and (7) withdrawing the plea would squander judicial resources, as well as the prosecutor's and defense attorney's time. Van Haele v. State, 2004 WY 59, 90 P.3d 708,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. 2004).

Court, in sentencing defendant to state hospital, acts beyond jurisdiction. —

The court acted beyond its jurisdiction in including a mandate that the last three months of the defendant's sentence for mayhem be served at the state hospital. Polston v. State, 685 P.2d 1,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 297

(Wyo. 1984) (decided under prior law).

Consecutive sentences for assaulting two victims constitutional. —

Imposition of consecutive sentences upon conviction of two counts of aggravated assault and battery involving two victims did not violate the double jeopardy clause, where the defendant committed two separate acts against two different individuals, each of which violated a single criminal statute. Tuggle v. State, 733 P.2d 610,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 417

(Wyo. 1987).

Lesser included offenses. —

The offense of reckless endangering as defined in §

6-2-504

is not a lesser included offense of aggravated assault and battery because reckless endangering encompasses an additional element not included in the elements of aggravated assault and battery. Sindelar v. State, 932 P.2d 730,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1997).

Misdemeanor of reckless endangerment, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-504

, is not a lesser-included offense of aggravated assault and battery; the offense of reckless endangerment encompasses an additional element, that the act was done recklessly, which is not included in the elements of aggravated assault and battery. Miller v. State, 2003 WY 55, 67 P.3d 1191,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 2003).

Jury instruction proper. —

Where the evidence supported a finding that defendant intentionally and knowingly inflicted serious injury upon the victim, then it no less established that he acted recklessly under circumstances manifesting extreme indifference to the value of human life; therefore, it was not plain error for the district court to instruct the jury that it could base its verdict on any and all proven theories of guilt.
Jealous v. State, 2011 WY 171, 267 P.3d 1101,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 2011).

Defendant's convictions for two counts of aggravated assault and battery, in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-502(a)(i), were proper because the jury was adequately instructed on the element of “recklessly under circumstances manifesting extreme indifference to the value of human life.”
Burnett v. State, 2011 WY 169, 267 P.3d 1083,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 2011).

Although the trial court erred in deriving the jury instruction defining attempt from Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-1-301

rather than Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-502(a)(i), it did not commit plain error where the instruction was not inconsistent with the ordinary meaning of attempt, and the instructions fairly and adequately covered the relevant issues and correctly stated the law. Cecil v. State, 2015 WY 158, 364 P.3d 1086,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 174

(Wyo. 2015).

District court erred in instructing the jury that assault was a lesser included offense of aggravated assault and battery where assault did not require a threat to use a drawn deadly weapon, and aggravated assault and battery did not require an attempt to cause bodily injury to another. Cecil v. State, 2015 WY 158, 364 P.3d 1086,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 174

(Wyo. 2015).
